New York, session 2025-2026, A3038.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general business law is amended by adding a new article 2 29-HHH to read as follows: 3 ARTICLE 29-HHH 4 ACTIONS INVOLVING COERCED DEBTS 5 Section 604-aa. Definitions. 6 604-bb. Notice of coerced debt. 7 604-cc. Coerced debt cause of action and affirmative defense. 8 604-dd. Scope. 9 § 604-aa. Definitions. As used in this article, the following terms 10 shall have the following meanings: 11 1. "Action" means any civil judicial proceeding as defined in section 12 one hundred five of the civil practice law and rules. 13 2. "Adequate documentation of coerced debt" means documentation that 14 identifies a particular debt, or a portion thereof, as coerced debt, 15 describes the circumstances under which such coerced debt was incurred, 16 and takes the form of any of the following: 17 (a) a police report; 18 (b) a federal trade commission identity theft report that identifies a 19 particular debt, or portion thereof, as a coerced debt; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04056-04-5 A. 3038--B 2 1 (c) an order from a court of competent jurisdiction setting forth 2 findings of coerced debt; or 3 (d) a written verification, from a qualified third party to whom the 4 debtor reported the coerced debt, which shall be satisfied by any sworn 5 or notarized statement including the required information as well as the 6 name, mailing address, and email address or telephone number, as appli- 7 cable, of such qualified third party's employer or, if self-employed, of 8 such qualified third party. 9 3. "Coerced debt" is debt incurred as a result of economic abuse, 10 including but not limited to, by means of fraud, duress, intimidation, 11 threat, force, coercion, manipulation, or undue influence, the non-con- 12 sensual use of the debtor's personal information. 13 4. "Creditor" means any person, firm, corporation or organization to 14 whom a debt is owed, due, or asserted to be due or owed, or any assignee 15 for value of said person, firm, corporation or organization, including 16 any debt collection agency or debt collector as defined by section six 17 hundred of this chapter; provided, however, that "creditor" shall not 18 include a person to whom a debt is allegedly owed, due, or asserted to 19 be due or owed, where the person asserting such claim caused the debt to 20 arise by engaging in one or more acts of coercion, as identified in 21 subdivision three of this section, against the debtor. 22 5. "Debt" means any obligation or alleged obligation of a consumer to 23 pay money arising out of a transaction in which the money, property, 24 insurance, rental arrears owed for use and occupancy of a dwelling, or 25 services which are the subject of such transaction are primarily for 26 personal, family, or household purposes, whether or not such obligation 27 has been reduced to a judgment. 28 6. "Debtor" means any natural person who owes or who is asserted to 29 owe a debt. 30 7. "Economic abuse", in the context of intimate relationships or 31 relationships between family or household members as defined by section 32 four hundred fifty-nine-a of the social services law, relationships 33 between victims of human trafficking and traffickers, or relationships 34 between children, the elderly, or individuals eligible for protective 35 services under subdivision one of section four hundred seventy-three of 36 the social services law, and their caregivers, means behavior that is 37 coercive, deceptive, manipulative, or that controls, restrains, or 38 sabotages a person's ability to acquire, use, or maintain economic 39 resources to which they are entitled, including but not limited to using 40 coercion, fraud, or manipulation to: 41 (a) restrict a person's access to money, assets, credit, or financial 42 information; 43 (b) unfairly use a person's personal information or personal economic 44 resources, including money, assets, and/or credit; or 45 (c) exert undue influence over a person's financial and economic 46 behavior or decisions, including but not limited to forcing default on 47 joint or other financial obligations, exploiting powers of attorney, 48 guardianship, or conservatorship, or failing or neglecting to act in the 49 best interests of a person to whom one has a fiduciary duty. 50 8. "Personal information" includes, but is not limited to, a name, 51 address, telephone or mobile phone number, driver registration number or 52 non-driver identification card number, social security number, email 53 address, social media profile or screen name, place of employment, 54 employee identification number, mother's maiden name, financial services 55 account number or code, savings account number or code, checking account 56 number or code, debit or credit card number or code, automated teller A. 3038--B 3 1 machine number or code, electronic serial number, any personal identifi- 2 cation number or password of a debtor, and a debtor's personal docu- 3 ments, including, but not limited to, such debtor's driver's license or 4 non-driver identification card, passport, permanent resident card, visa, 5 birth certificate, social security card, and any copies thereof or 6 information contained therein. "Personal identification number or pass- 7 word", as used in this subdivision, means any number or alphanumeric 8 code which may be used alone or in conjunction with any other informa- 9 tion to assume the identity of another person or access financial 10 resources or credit information of another person. 11 9. "Pleading" means any complaint, petition, counterclaim, cross- 12 claim, interpleader complaint, third-party complaint or any similar 13 papers asserting a claim and demand for relief required to be filed with 14 the court pursuant to rule twenty-one hundred two of the civil practice 15 law and rules, the rules of the chief administrator of the courts, or 16 any local rule or practice established by the court. 17 10. "Qualified third party" means any (a) law enforcement officer; (b) 18 employee of a court of the state; (c) attorney, physician, psychiatrist, 19 psychologist, social worker, registered nurse, therapist, or clinical 20 professional counselor licensed to practice in any state; (d) person 21 employed by or working on behalf of a government or non-profit office, 22 agency, or service that advises or provides services to persons regard- 23 ing domestic violence, family violence, human trafficking, or abuse of 24 children, the elderly, or dependent adults; or (e) member of the clergy 25 of a church or religious society or denomination. 26 § 604-bb. Notice of coerced debt. 1. Upon receipt of the following, a 27 creditor shall cease collection activities until completion of the 28 review under subdivision three of this section: 29 (a) adequate documentation of coerced debt; and 30 (b) the debtor's statement that a particular debt being collected, or 31 portion thereof, is coerced debt. 32 2. (a) If a debtor notifies a creditor, either orally or in writing, 33 that a debt is a coerced debt but does not provide the documentation 34 required in subdivision one of this section, or such documentation is 35 insufficient, such creditor shall provide written notice to such debtor 36 that includes the following text: 37 "UNDER NEW YORK GENERAL BUSINESS LAW 604-BB, YOU HAVE THE RIGHT TO 38 DISPUTE DEBT THAT YOU BELIEVE IS COERCED DEBT. A DEBT IS "COERCED" WHEN 39 IT IS INCURRED IN A CONSUMER'S NAME BECAUSE OF THREATS, INTIMIDATION, OR 40 FORCE BY ANOTHER PERSON. 41 TO DISPUTE COERCED DEBT, YOU MUST SUBMIT A "NOTICE OF COERCED DEBT" IN 42 WRITING. THE "NOTICE OF COERCED DEBT" MUST INCLUDE TWO DOCUMENTS: 43 1 - A SWORN OR NOTARIZED STATEMENT BY YOU, THE ALLEGED DEBTOR, STATING 44 THAT A CERTAIN DEBT OR PORTION OF A DEBT BEING COLLECTED IS COERCED 45 DEBT. 46 2 - "ADEQUATE DOCUMENTATION OF COERCED DEBT" 47 TO PROVIDE "ADEQUATE DOCUMENTATION OF COERCED DEBT," YOU ARE REQUIRED 48 TO PROVIDE ONLY ONE OF THE FOLLOWING DOCUMENTS, BUT YOU MAY PROVIDE MORE 49 THAN ONE. 50 1 - A POLICE REPORT 51 2 - A FEDERAL TRADE COMMISSION IDENTITY THEFT REPORT 52 3 - A COURT ORDER FINDING THAT THE DEBT WAS COERCED 53 4 - A NOTARIZED STATEMENT FROM A "QUALIFIED THIRD PARTY" THAT YOU 54 REPORTED THE COERCED DEBT TO. 55 EXAMPLES OF "QUALIFIED THIRD PARTIES" INCLUDE SOCIAL WORKERS AND 56 ATTORNEYS; DOCTORS, NURSES, AND THERAPISTS; EMPLOYEES FROM GOVERNMENT OR A. 3038--B 4 1 NON-PROFIT AGENCIES THAT WORK WITH SURVIVORS OF VIOLENCE; MEMBERS OF THE 2 CLERGY; ELECTED OFFICIALS; AND LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS. 3 NO MATTER WHICH FORM OF "ADEQUATE DOCUMENTATION OF COERCED DEBT" YOU 4 PROVIDE, IT MUST IDENTIFY THE PARTICULAR DEBT, STATE THAT IT IS COERCED 5 DEBT, AND DESCRIBE THE CIRCUMSTANCES THAT CAUSED THE DEBT TO BE 6 INCURRED. 7 TO DISPUTE DEBT THAT YOU BELIEVE IS COERCED DEBT, PLEASE SEND THE 8 REQUIRED DOCUMENTS TO (DESIGNATED ADDRESS). AFTER RECEIVING YOUR NOTICE 9 OF COERCED DEBT, WE WILL INVESTIGATE YOUR CLAIM AND RESPOND IN WRITING 10 WITHIN 35 BUSINESS DAYS. FOR MORE INFORMATION, PLEASE CALL (DESIGNATED 11 PHONE NUMBER)." 12 (b) If a debtor notifies a creditor in writing that a particular debt 13 being collected, or portion thereof, is coerced debt, but omits informa- 14 tion under subdivision one of this section, and if such creditor does 15 not cease such collection activities, such creditor shall provide writ- 16 ten notice to such debtor of the additional information that is 17 required. 18 3. (a) Within ten business days of receiving the information under 19 subdivision one of this section, the creditor shall, if such creditor 20 furnishes adverse information about the debtor to a consumer reporting 21 agency, notify such consumer reporting agency that the account is 22 disputed. 23 (b) Within thirty business days of receiving the information under 24 subdivision one of this section, the creditor shall complete a review 25 considering all information provided by the debtor and other information 26 available to such creditor in such creditor's file. In connection with 27 such review and communication of the outcome of such review, the credi- 28 tor shall: 29 (i) neither directly nor indirectly contact the individual accused of 30 causing the coerced debt to be incurred; 31 (ii) use only the contact information the debtor provides with the 32 information under subdivision one of this section when attempting to 33 contact such debtor and shall not use any other contact information, 34 even if associated with the account under review, when attempting to 35 contact such debtor; and 36 (iii) not disclose the documents, information, or contact information 37 the debtor provides with the information under subdivision one of this 38 section to any other person, including, but not limited to, joint 39 account holders, without such debtor's express written authorization. 40 For purposes of this subparagraph, sending documents, information, or 41 contact information the debtor provides under subdivision one of this 42 section to a mailing or electronic mail address other than the one 43 provided by the debtor constitutes unlawful disclosure to a third party, 44 even if such mail or electronic mail address is associated with the 45 account. 46 (c) Within five business days of completing the review under paragraph 47 (b) of this subdivision, a creditor who recommences collection activ- 48 ities based on such review shall notify the debtor in writing of such 49 creditor's determination and the good faith basis for such determi- 50 nation, and shall enclose all documents and information upon which such 51 creditor bases its determination therewith, provided however such 52 documentation shall not include personally identifiable information of 53 another person. Such written notice shall include a notice of the 54 debtor's right to request reconsideration of such determination to 55 recommence collection activities under subdivision four of this section. A. 3038--B 5 1 (d) Within five business days of completing the review under paragraph 2 (b) of this subdivision, a creditor who ceases collection activities 3 under this section and, based on such review, does not recommence such 4 collection activities, shall: 5 (i) notify the debtor in writing that it is ceasing collection activ- 6 ities based on such debtor's claim of coerced debt; 7 (ii) contact any consumer reporting agencies to which it furnishes 8 information about the debtor and the particular debt and instruct such 9 consumer reporting agencies to delete such information; and 10 (iii) if the creditor is also a debt collector or debt collection 11 agency, as defined in section six hundred of this chapter, notify the 12 original creditor that it has ceased collection activities because the 13 debt was found to be a coerced debt. 14 4. A debtor who receives written notice under paragraph (c) of subdi- 15 vision three of this section that the creditor will recommence 16 collection activities against such debtor based on such creditor's 17 determination under subdivision three of this section may make a request 18 to the creditor that the creditor reconsider such determination to 19 recommence collection activities within thirty days of the date of mail- 20 ing of such written determination. A debtor requesting reconsideration 21 of a creditor's determination to recommence collection activities shall 22 be permitted to submit additional adequate documentation of coerced 23 debt, as defined in this article. A creditor who receives a debtors 24 request for reconsideration shall complete a review of all information, 25 including additional adequate documentation submitted, within thirty 26 days of receiving such request. Submitting a request for reconsider- 27 ation of the determination to the creditor shall not be a condition to 28 bringing an action under section six hundred four-cc of this article. 29 5. No inference or presumption that the debt is valid or invalid, or 30 that the debtor is liable or not liable for such debt, shall arise if 31 the creditor decides after completing the review under subdivision three 32 of this section to cease or recommence the debt collection activities. 33 The exercise or non-exercise of rights under this section shall not 34 constitute a waiver of any other right or defense of the debtor, credi- 35 tor, debt collector, or any other person. 36 6. Ceasing collection activities under this section shall not toll the 37 statute of limitations period on any action to collect the debt. 38 7. If at any time any individual or entity, including, but not limited 39 to the creditor, such creditor's assignor, or any assignee, recommences 40 collection activities on the debt after ceasing collection activities on 41 such debt based on such creditor's review of such debtor's notice of 42 coerced debt, such debtor may submit a subsequent notice of coerced 43 debt. A subsequent notice of coerced debt submitted under this subdivi- 44 sion shall be governed by subdivisions one through six of this section. 45 8. A debtor injured by a violation of this section shall have a cause 46 of action against the creditor to recover statutory damages of one thou- 47 sand dollars, actual damages, if any, and the costs and attorneys' fees 48 reasonably incurred in bringing such action. 49 § 604-cc. Coerced debt cause of action and affirmative defense. 1. A 50 person shall not cause another person to incur a coerced debt. A person 51 who causes another person to incur a coerced debt in violation of this 52 subdivision shall be civilly liable to the creditor, and/or the debtor 53 in whose name such coerced debt was incurred if such debtor has already 54 paid all or part of such coerced debt, for the amount of such debt, or 55 portion thereof, determined by the court to be a coerced debt, as well 56 as such creditor's and/or debtor's costs and attorneys' fees reasonably A. 3038--B 6 1 incurred in bringing the action. An action under this subdivision shall 2 be commenced within three years of the later of: (a) the creditor's 3 determination that all or part of such debt is coerced debt; or (b) a 4 court's determination that all or part of such debt is coerced debt. 5 2. (a) A debtor shall have a cause of action against a creditor in any 6 court having jurisdiction to issue a declaratory judgment establishing 7 that a debt or portion of a debt asserted to be owed to such creditor is 8 a coerced debt. Notwithstanding section one thousand one of the civil 9 practice law and rules, any individual alleged to have caused such 10 coerced debt to be incurred shall not be a necessary party to such 11 action. Such action shall not be commenced and maintained unless the 12 following conditions are satisfied: 13 (i) (1) the debtor provides by first class mail with certification of 14 mailing, certified mail, overnight delivery, or other method that allows 15 for confirmation of the date of mailing, the notice of coerced debt or 16 subsequent notice of coerced debt under section six hundred four-bb of 17 this article, provided, however, that receipt of the notice of coerced 18 debt shall not be a condition to bringing such action if it is sent in a 19 properly addressed envelope; and 20 (2) the thirty-day period under paragraph (b) of subdivision three of 21 section six hundred four-bb of this article has expired and the debtor 22 has not received written notice that collection activities have ceased; 23 or 24 (ii) the debtor receives a written determination under paragraph (c) 25 of subdivision three of section six hundred four-bb of this article that 26 the particular disputed debt is not coerced debt. 27 (b) The submission of a request for reconsideration under subdivision 28 four of section six hundred four-bb of this article of the creditor's 29 decision to recommence debt collection activities based on such credi- 30 tor's review of the debtor's notice of coerced debt is not a condition 31 to commencing an action under this subdivision. 32 3. In an action under subdivision two of this section, a debtor shall 33 plead the allegations of coerced debt with particularity and shall 34 attach the documents provided to the creditor pursuant to subdivision 35 one of section six hundred four-bb of this article to any complaint. 36 4. A debtor who establishes by a preponderance of the evidence in an 37 action pursuant to subdivision two of this section that a debt or 38 portion of a debt asserted to be owed to the creditor is coerced debt 39 shall be entitled to the following relief: 40 (a) a declaratory judgment stating that the debt or portion thereof is 41 coerced debt and that the alleged debtor shall not be liable for such 42 coerced debt; 43 (b) an order enjoining or restraining the creditor from holding or 44 attempting to hold the debtor personally liable for the coerced debt or 45 attempting to obtain or enforce any judgment thereon against such debtor 46 and enjoining and restraining all future collection activities with 47 respect to such debt; 48 (c) an order dismissing any other cause of action brought by the cred- 49 itor to enforce or collect the coerced debt from the debtor; 50 (d) if the creditor has furnished adverse information to a consumer 51 reporting agency with respect to such coerced debt, an order directing 52 the creditor to notify such agency to delete all such adverse informa- 53 tion; and 54 (e) the costs and attorneys' fees reasonably incurred in bringing such 55 action. A. 3038--B 7 1 5. In any action by a creditor against a debtor to collect a debt, it 2 shall be an affirmative defense to such action that all or a portion of 3 the debt is coerced debt. Providing notice to the creditor under 4 section six hundred four-bb of this article shall not be a prerequisite 5 to asserting such defense; provided, however, the documents described in 6 subdivision one of section six hundred four-bb of this article shall be 7 annexed to the debtor's answer. A debtor who prevails on an affirmative 8 defense of coerced debt shall be entitled to the costs and attorneys' 9 fees reasonably incurred in defending against the action. Notwithstand- 10 ing section one thousand one of the civil practice law and rules, any 11 individual alleged to have caused such coerced debt to be incurred shall 12 not be or become a necessary party to such action. 13 6. An action pursuant to subdivision two of this section shall be 14 commenced within three years after the date on which the debtor provided 15 the notice of coerced debt pursuant to section six hundred four-bb of 16 this article to the creditor; provided, however, that if such creditor, 17 its assignor, or any assignee recommences collection activities on the 18 debt after ceasing collection activities on such debt based on such 19 creditor's review of the debtor's claim of coerced debt, such debtor 20 shall have the right to file a subsequent notice of coerced debt pursu- 21 ant to subdivision seven of section six hundred four-bb of this article 22 and the statute of limitations shall commence on the date on which such 23 debtor provided such subsequent notice of coerced debt. 24 7. If requested by the debtor, the court presiding over any action in 25 which coerced debt is raised as a claim or affirmative defense shall 26 take appropriate steps necessary to prevent abuse of such debtor or an 27 immediate family member of such debtor, including but not limited to the 28 sealing of court records, the redaction of such debtor's or their imme- 29 diate family member's personal information, and/or directing that any 30 disposition or hearing be held remotely. 31 8. The provisions of this article shall not be construed so as to 32 prevent a creditor from enforcing any claim or collecting judgment aris- 33 ing out of a lawful debt or portion thereof from any other person or 34 entity other than the coerced debtor. 35 9. For debts secured by real or personal property, the private cause 36 of action and affirmative defense authorized by this section shall 37 affect only the debtor's liability for any deficiency after the foreclo- 38 sure, repossession, or surrender and disposition of the subject collat- 39 eral. 40 10. Whenever there shall be a violation of this section, an applica- 41 tion may be made by the attorney general in the name of the people of 42 the state of New York to a court or justice having jurisdiction to issue 43 an injunction, and upon notice to the defendant of not less than five 44 days, to enjoin and restrain the continuance of such violations. If it 45 shall appear to the satisfaction of the court or justice that the 46 defendant has, in fact, violated this section, an injunction may be 47 issued by such court or justice, enjoining or restraining any violation, 48 without requiring proof that any person has, in fact, been injured or 49 damaged thereby. In any such proceeding the court may make allowances to 50 the attorney general as provided in section eighty-three hundred three 51 of the civil practice law and rules, and may make direct restitution. In 52 connection with any such proposed application, the attorney general is 53 authorized to take proof and make a determination of the relevant facts 54 and to issue subpoenas in accordance with the civil practice law and 55 rules. Whenever the court shall determine that a violation of this A. 3038--B 8 1 section has occurred, the court may impose a civil penalty for each 2 violation up to five thousand dollars. 3 § 604-dd. Scope. The provisions of this article shall apply only to a 4 creditor to whom a debt is owed, due, or asserted to be due or owed, 5 where such debt is asserted to be the result of economic abuse. The 6 provisions of this article shall not be construed to impose any duty or 7 liability not expressly provided herein. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 9 have become a law.